Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Installment Sales Contract

190.090.
Definitions for KRS 190.090 to 190.140.

As used in KRS

190.090

to

190.140

, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, and any other group however organized;

“Retail installment sale” means any sale for other than agricultural, business, or commercial use evidenced by a retail installment contract wherein retail buyer agrees to buy and retail seller agrees to sell a motor vehicle at a time sale price payable in two (2) or more installments. The cash sale price of the motor vehicle, the amount, if any, included for insurance and other benefits, official fees and the finance charge, shall together constitute the time sale price;

“Retail installment contract” means any agreement, entered into in this state, evidencing a retail installment sale of a motor vehicle, other than for the purpose of resale, pursuant to which title to, or a lien upon the motor vehicle is retained by the retail seller as security for the retail buyer’s obligation. This term includes a mortgage, conditional sale contract or any contract for the bailment or leasing of a motor vehicle by which the bailee or lessee contracts to pay as compensation for its use a sum substantially equivalent to the time sale price of the motor vehicle and by which it is agreed that the bailee or lessee is bound to become, or has the option of becoming for no additional consideration or for nominal additional consideration, the owner of such motor vehicle;

“Motor vehicle” means any device in, upon, or by which any person or property is, or may be transported or drawn upon a highway. The term does not include self-propelled wheelchairs and invalid tricycles, tractors, power shovels, road machinery, implements of husbandry and other agricultural machinery, or other machinery not designed primarily for highway transportation but which may incidentally transport persons or property on a highway, or devices which move upon or are guided by a track or travel through the air. A moped as defined in KRS

190.010

and a recreational vehicle shall be subject to the same requirements as a motor vehicle under this section;

“Retail seller” or “seller” means a person who sells or agrees to sell a motor vehicle under a retail installment contract to a retail buyer;

“Retail buyer” or “buyer” means a person who buys or agrees to buy a motor vehicle from a retail seller not for the purpose of resale and who executes a retail installment contract in connection therewith;

“Sales finance company” means a person engaged in the business of creating and holding or purchasing or acquiring retail installment contracts from a retail seller. The term includes a bank, trust company, private banker, industrial bank, investment company or national bank, if so engaged;

“Cash sale price” means, for purposes of KRS

190.090

to

190.140

only, and not for purposes of KRS

138.455

to

138.470

, the price at which the seller would in good faith sell to the buyer, and the buyer would in good faith buy from the seller, the motor vehicle which is the subject matter of the retail installment contract, if such sale were a sale for cash, instead of a retail installment sale. The cash sale price may include:

Any taxes, registration fees, certificate of title fees, and, if any, license fees;

Charges for delivery, servicing, repairing, or improving the motor vehicle, including accessories and their installation;

Charges for a service contract, mechanical breakdown insurance, a maintenance agreement, a vehicle protection product, and any other goods or services related to the sale that the buyer agrees to purchase from the seller; and

Any processing fee;

“Official fees” means the fees prescribed by law for filing, recording, or otherwise perfecting and releasing or satisfying a retained title or a lien created by a retail installment contract;

“Finance charge” means that part of the time sale price by which it exceeds the aggregate of the cash sale price, the amount, if any, included for insurance and other benefits and official fees included in the retail installment sale;

“Maintenance agreement” means a contract of limited duration that provides for scheduled maintenance and parts related to such maintenance. A maintenance agreement shall not be considered a contract of, or for, insurance;

“Service contract” has the same meaning as in KRS

304.5-070

(1)(p);

“Truth in Lending Act” means Title I of Pub. L. No. 90-321, codified at 15

U.S.C. secs. 1601

to 1667f, as may be amended from time to time;

“United States Rule” means that in partial payments on a debt, each payment is applied first to the finance charge and any remainder reduces the principal. Under this rule, accrued but unpaid finance charges cannot be added to the principal and interest cannot be compounded;

“Vehicle protection product” means a vehicle protection device, system, or service that is installed on or applied to a vehicle that is designed to deter the theft of the vehicle, and includes a written warranty that provides that if the product fails to deter the theft of the vehicle, the warranty holder shall be paid specified incidental costs by the warrantor as a result of the failure of the device, system, or service to perform pursuant to the terms of the warranty. Vehicle protection products include but are not limited to window etch products and body part marking products. A vehicle protection product shall not be considered a contract of, or for, insurance; and

Words in the singular include the plural and vice versa.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 1956; 1978, ch. 349, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 391, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2012, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

190.100.
Installment contract.

Every retail installment contract shall:

Be in writing in at least eight (8) point type;

Contain all the agreements of the parties;

Be signed by the retail buyer; and

Require a copy thereof to be furnished to the retail buyer at the time of the execution of the contract.

A retail installment contract need not appear on a single page and a contract that includes a provision incorporating agreements that appear after the buyer’s signature, including without limitation, terms, and conditions on the back or on subsequent pages, shall be deemed in compliance with KRS 446.060(1).

No provisions for confession of judgment, power of attorney therefor, or wage assignment contained in any retail installment contract shall be valid or enforceable.

The holder of a retail installment contract may collect a delinquency and collection charge on each installment in arrears for a period not less than ten (10) days in an amount not in excess of five percent (5%) of each installment or fifteen dollars ($15), whichever is greater. In addition to such delinquency and collection charge, the retail installment contract may provide for the payment of reasonable attorneys’ fees where such contract is referred to an attorney not a salaried employee of the holder of the contract for collection, plus the court costs.

Unless notice has been given to the retail buyer of actual or intended assignment of a retail installment contract, payment thereunder or tender thereof made by the retail buyer to the last known holder of such contract shall be binding upon all subsequent holders or assignees.

Upon written request from the retail buyer, the holder of the retail installment contract shall give or forward to the retail buyer a written statement of the total amount unpaid under such contract. A retail buyer shall be given a written receipt for any payment when made in cash.

The retail installment contract shall contain the following:

The cash sale price of the motor vehicle which is the subject matter of the retail installment sale;

The amount of the retail buyer’s down payment, whether made in money or goods, or partly in money or partly in goods;

The difference between paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection;

Amount, if any, included for insurance and other benefits; and

Types of coverage and benefits;

Official fees as defined in KRS

190.090

;

Any amounts eligible for inclusion in the cash sale price as defined in KRS

190.090

that the seller elects to separately itemize; and

Principal balance, which is the sum of paragraphs (c), (d), and (e) of this subsection.

A retail installment contract is deemed in compliance with subsection (2) of this section if it satisfies the requirements of the Truth in Lending Act that would apply to a retail installment contract within the Truth in Lending Act’s scope, regardless of whether the Truth in Lending Act would apply to the retail installment sale at issue.

The amount, if any, included for insurance, shall not exceed the premiums chargeable in accordance with applicable rate filings made with the commissioner of insurance. Every retail seller or sales finance company, if insurance on the motor vehicle is included in a retail installment contract shall within thirty (30) days after execution of the retail installment contract send or cause to be sent to the retail buyer a policy or policies or certificate of insurance, which insurance shall be written by a company authorized to do business in this state, clearly setting forth the amount of the premium, the kind or kinds of insurance and the scope of the coverage and all the terms, exceptions, limitations, restrictions and conditions of the contract or contracts of the insurance. The buyer of a motor vehicle under a retail installment contract shall have the privilege of purchasing such insurance from an agent or broker of his own selection and of selecting an insurance company acceptable to the seller; provided, however, that the inclusion of the insurance premium in the retail installment contract when the buyer selects the agent, broker or company, shall be optional with the seller. If any such policy is canceled, the unearned insurance premium refund received by the holder of the contract shall be credited to the final maturing installments of the retail installment contract. For purposes of this subsection, single interest insurance insuring the retail seller or sales finance company shall not be considered insurance on the motor vehicle. Neither a copy of the policy nor a certificate of insurance of this type of insurance shall be sent to the retail buyer.

Any sales finance company hereunder may purchase or acquire from any retail seller any retail installment contract on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between them. No filing of the assignment, no notice to the retail buyer of the assignment, and no requirement that the retail seller shall be deprived of dominion over the payments thereunder or the goods covered thereby if repossessed by the retail seller shall be necessary to the validity of a written assignment of a retail installment contract as against creditors, subsequent purchasers, pledgees, mortgagees, and lien claimants of the retail seller.

An acknowledgment in the body of the retail installment contract by the retail buyer of the delivery of a copy thereof shall be conclusive proof of delivery in any action or proceeding by or against any assignee of a retail installment contract.

A “debt cancellation agreement” is a written provision in a retail installment contract, or separate addendum thereto, which provides for cancellation of all or part of an obligation of the buyer or obligor upon the occurrence of a specified event.

In accordance with subsection (2)(d) of this section, a debt cancellation agreement shall be itemized by type on the retail installment contract and considered an “other benefit” for which the seller, sales finance company, or other holder may charge the buyer or obligor.

A debt cancellation agreement shall not be considered a contract of, or for, insurance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 1956; 1984, ch. 391, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 384, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 240, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

190.110.
Finance charges — Rates — Computations.

The finance charge allowed by this subsection may be precomputed by using an add-on method. If the finance charge in a retail installment sale is precomputed it shall not exceed the following rates:

Class 1. Any new or used motor vehicle designated by the manufacturer by a year model not earlier than the year in which the sale is made -- eleven dollars ($11) per one hundred dollars ($100) of principal balance, as determined pursuant to KRS 190.100(2), per year of the contract.

Class 2. Any new motor vehicle not in class 1 and any used motor vehicle designated by the manufacturer by a year model of one (1) or two (2) years prior to the year in which the sale is made — thirteen dollars ($13) per one hundred dollars ($100) of principal balance, as determined pursuant to
KRS 190.100(2), per year of the contract.

Class 3. All other motor vehicles not in class 1 or 2 — fifteen dollars ($15) per one hundred dollars ($100) of principal balance, as determined pursuant to KRS 190.100(2), per year of the contract.

If the finance charge applicable to a retail installment sale is precomputed and the retail installment contract provides for successive monthly payments, substantially equal in amount, the maximum finance charge computed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for a partial year occurring at the beginning of a contract with a term of less than one (1) year or at the end of a contract with a remaining term greater than a year shall be prorated at the annual maximum amount of finance charge computed under subsection (1) of this section, based on the number of months in the partial year.

If the finance charge applicable to a retail installment sale is precomputed and the retail installment contract provides for unequal or irregular installment payments, the maximum finance rate of the finance charge shall be at the effective rate provided in subsection (1) of this section, having due regard for the schedule of payment.

Alternatively, the seller may, at his option, compute the finance charge in a retail installment sale on a simple interest basis, taking into account the actual number of days between payments under the contract using a fixed or variable rate not to exceed the effective rate of finance charge permitted under subsection (1) of this section.

For the purposes of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the effective rate of the finance charge permitted by subsection (1) of this section shall be the rate computed in accordance with the actuarial method or the United States Rule method for a retail installment contract that provides for:

The total finance charge permitted under subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

Successive monthly payments substantially equal in amount; and

The purchase of a vehicle of the same vehicle class over the same term as the unequal or irregular installment payment contract subject to subsection (3) of this section or the simple interest basis contract subject to subsection (4) of this section. In computing the effective rate, the seller may make any assumptions and use any method that the Truth in Lending Act and the regulations promulgated thereunder would permit in computing the annual percentage rate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 1956; 1980, ch. 321, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 391, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2012, ch. 96, § 3, effective July 12, 2012.

190.120.
Payment in full before maturity.

If the finance charge applicable to the retail installment contract has been determined by a precomputed method, the retail buyer may pay in full at any time before the stated maturity date and upon such prepayment in full the retail buyer shall receive a refund of a portion of the finance charge not less than the refund computed in accordance with the Rule of 78’s. An acquisition cost of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be deducted from the finance charge before computation of the refund. Where the refund is less than one dollar ($1) no refund need be made and acceleration of the balance by the seller, caused by the default of the buyer or otherwise, shall not affect the date of computation. Any balance remaining unpaid as of the stated maturity date shall then be subject to accumulation of additional finance charges at the rate specified in the contract.

If the finance charge applicable to the retail installment contract has or will be determined by a simple interest method, the retail buyer may pay in full at any time before the stated maturity date without penalty, except that the holder may collect and receive a minimum finance charge of twenty-five dollars ($25) in any event.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 4, effective July 1, 1956; 1984, ch. 391, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2012, ch. 96, § 4, effective July 12, 2012.

190.124.
Statute of limitations on action for breach of retail installment contract.

The holder of a retail installment contract shall commence an action against the retail buyer to recover monetary damages or other relief for breach of the retail installment contract within the earlier of the following:

Four (4) years after the maturity date of the retail installment contract;

If the motor vehicle has been repossessed, voluntarily or involuntarily, four (4) years after the date the motor vehicle was sold or otherwise disposed of by the repossessing retail seller, sales finance company, or other owner of the retail installment contract; or

If the maturity date is accelerated by reason of default, regardless of whether the motor vehicle has been repossessed, within four (4) years of the accelerated maturity date.

The provisions of this section shall control over any contrary provision of KRS Chapter 413.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 242, § 62, effective July 12, 2006.

190.130.
Extension, deferral or renewal — When — Service fee — Additional charge.

The holder of a retail installment contract may, upon agreement with the retail buyer, extend the scheduled due date, defer the scheduled payment of all or part of any installment payment or payments, or renew the balance of such contract. In any such case the holder may restate the amount of the installments and the time schedule therefor, and collect as a refinance charge for such extension, deferment or renewal, a flat service fee not to exceed five dollars ($5) and an additional finance charge computed at the same rate and by the same method as originally set out in the retail installment contract computed from the date of such extension, deferment or renewal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 5, effective July 1, 1956; 1984, ch. 391, § 5, effective July 13, 1984.

190.140.
Citation of KRS 190.090 to 190.140.

KRS

190.090

to

190.140

may be cited as “The Motor Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 105, § 8, effective July 1, 1956.